Utah statutes.
76-8-1204.   Disclosure by provider required -- Penalty.

(1) (a)  Any provider who solicits, requests, or receives, actually or constructively, any payment or contribution through a payment, assessment, gift, devise, bequest, or other means, directly or indirectly, from a client or client's family shall notify the state agency administering the public assistance the client is receiving of the amount of payment or contribution in writing within 10 days after receiving that payment or contribution.

(b)  If the payment or contribution is to be made under an agreement, written or oral, the provider shall notify the state agency administering the public assistance the client is receiving of the payment or contribution within 10 days after entering into the agreement.

(2)  Any person who intentionally, knowingly, or recklessly fails to notify the state agency administering the public assistance the client is receiving as required by this section is guilty of public assistance fraud as provided in Section 76-8-1206.

